Vermont, session 2025-2026, H300.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5830g is added to read:
§ 5830g. TAX CREDIT FOR EMERGENCY RESPONDERS
(a) A qualified emergency responder shall be eligible for a refundable
credit against the tax imposed under section 5822 of this title during the
taxable year in the amount of $500.00.
(b) As used in this section, “qualified emergency responder” means:
(1) emergency medical personnel as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2651(6),
volunteer personnel as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2651(15), and first responders
VT LEG #380543 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.300
2025 Page 2 of 3
providing first responder service as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2651(10) who are
licensed by the Department of Health pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 2681; and
(2) volunteer firefighters, provided the firefighter is in good standing
with and qualifies as an active volunteer member of any fire organization or
fire brigade in this State pursuant to the standards adopted by the Vermont Fire
Service Training Council under 20 V.S.A. § 3153(a)(1)(F).
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. § 3153(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Council shall:
(1) Establish by rules adopted pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25:
* * *
(F) Standards to define active service for volunteer firefighters for
purposes of determining eligibility for the tax credit for emergency responders
under 32 V.S.A. § 5830g.
* * *
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5813 is amended to read:
§ 5813. STATUTORY PURPOSES
* * *
(aa) The statutory purpose of the tax credit for emergency responders under
section 5830g of this title is to recognize the public service of licensed
emergency medical personnel, first responders, and volunteer firefighters who
provide lifesaving measures in Vermont.
VT LEG #380543 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.300
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this section and Secs. 1 (tax credit for
emergency responders) and 3 (statutory purpose; tax credit for emergency
responders) shall take effect retroactively on January 1, 2025 and shall apply to
taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2025.
(b) Sec. 2 shall take effect on passage and shall apply to tax credits for
emergency responders claimed for taxable years beginning on and after
January 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380543 v.1